California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Upon receiving a protest pursuant to Section 3085, the board shall fix a time and place of hearing within 60 days, and shall send by certified mail a copy of the order to the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, the protesting association, and all individuals and groups that have requested notification by the board of protests and decisions of the board. The board or an administrative law judge designated by the board shall hear and consider the oral and documented evidence introduced by the parties and other interested individuals and groups, and the board shall make its decision solely on the record so made. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2
 of the Government Code and Sections 11507.3, 11507.6, 11507.7, 11511, 11511.5, 11513, 11514, 11515, and 11517 of the Government Code apply to these proceedings.

(b) In a hearing on a protest filed pursuant to Section 3085, the association shall have the burden of proof to establish a violation of the applicable section by the subject manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch.

(c) A member of the board who is a new motor vehicle dealer may not participate in, hear, comment, or advise other members upon, or decide, a matter involving a protest filed pursuant to this article unless all parties to the protest stipulate otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 17.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 3085.10.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.4.

(a) The decision of the board shall be in writing and shall contain findings of fact and a determination of the issues presented. The decision shall sustain, conditionally sustain, overrule, or conditionally overrule the protest. Conditions imposed by the board shall be for the purpose of assuring performance of binding contractual agreements between franchisees and franchisors or otherwise serving the purposes of this article. The board shall act within 30 days after the hearing, within 30 days after the board receives a proposed decision when the case is heard before an administrative law judge alone, or within a period necessitated by Section 11517 of the Government Code, or as may be mutually agreed upon by the parties.
 Copies of the board’s decision shall be delivered to the parties personally or sent to them by certified mail, as well as to all individuals and groups that have requested notification by the board of protests and decisions by the board. The board’s decision shall be final upon its delivery or mailing and a reconsideration or rehearing is not permitted.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code, if a protest is heard by an administrative law judge alone, 10 days after receipt by the board of the administrative law judge’s proposed decision, a copy of the proposed decision shall be filed by the board as a public record and a copy shall be served by the board on each party and
 the party’s attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 17.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 3085.10.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.6.

Either party may seek judicial review of final decisions of the board. An appeal shall be filed within 45 days from the date on which the final order of the board is made public and is delivered to the parties personally or is sent to them by certified mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 17.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 3085.10.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.8.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable to any association which is primarily owned by or comprised of new motor vehicle dealers and acts on behalf of its new motor vehicle franchisees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 17.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 3085.10.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.10.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 796, Sec. 17.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 6, commencing with Section 3085.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Road Usage Charge Pilot Program [3090. - 3093.]

3090.

(a) The Chair of the California Transportation Commission shall create, in consultation with the Secretary of the Transportation Agency, a Road Usage Charge (RUC) Technical Advisory Committee.

(b) (1) The purpose of the technical advisory committee is to guide the development and evaluation of a pilot program to assess the potential for mileage-based revenue collection for California’s roads and highways as an alternative to the gas tax system.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2019, the technical advisory committee shall continue to assess the potential for mechanisms, including, but not limited to, a mileage-based revenue collection system, to use as alternative methods to the existing
 gas tax system for generating the revenue necessary to maintain and operate the state’s transportation system.

(c) The technical advisory committee shall consist of 15 members. In selecting the members of the technical advisory committee, the chair shall consider individuals who are representative of the telecommunications industry, highway user groups, the data security and privacy industry, privacy rights advocacy organizations, regional transportation agencies, national research and policymaking bodies, including, but not limited to, the Transportation Research Board and the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials, Members of the Legislature, and other relevant stakeholders as determined by the chair.

(d) Pursuant to Section 14512 of the Government Code, the technical advisory committee may request the Department of Transportation to perform such work
 as the technical advisory committee deems necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities.

(e) The technical advisory committee shall study RUC alternatives to the gas tax. The technical advisory committee shall gather public comment related to the activities described in subdivision (b) and shall make recommendations to the Secretary of the Transportation Agency on the design of a pilot program to test alternative RUC approaches. The technical advisory committee may also make recommendations on the criteria to be used to evaluate the pilot program.

(f) In studying alternatives to the current gas tax system and developing recommendations on the design of a pilot program to test alternative RUC approaches pursuant to subdivision (e), the technical advisory committee shall take all of the following into consideration:

(1) The availability, adaptability, reliability, and security of methods that might be used in recording and reporting highway use.

(2) The necessity of protecting all personally identifiable information used in reporting highway use.

(3) The ease and cost of recording and reporting highway use.

(4) The ease and cost of administering the collection of taxes and fees as an alternative to the current system of taxing highway use through motor vehicle fuel taxes.

(5) Effective methods of maintaining compliance.

(6) The ease of reidentifying location data, even when personally identifiable information has been removed from the data.

(7) Increased privacy concerns when location data is used in conjunction with other technologies.

(8) Public and private agency access, including law enforcement, to data collected and stored for purposes of the RUC to ensure individual privacy rights are protected pursuant to Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(g) The technical advisory committee shall consult with highway users and transportation stakeholders, including representatives of vehicle users, vehicle manufacturers, and fuel distributors as part of its duties pursuant to subdivision (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (SB 1328)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3093.)
-------------------------------------------

3091.

(a) Based on the recommendations of the RUC Technical Advisory Committee, the Transportation Agency shall implement a pilot program to identify and evaluate issues related to the potential implementation of an RUC program in California by January 1, 2017.

(b) At a minimum, the pilot program shall accomplish all of the following:

(1) Analyze alternative means of collecting road usage data, including at least one alternative that does not rely on electronic vehicle location data.

(2) Collect a minimum amount of personal information including location tracking information,
 necessary to implement the RUC program.

(3) Ensure that processes for collecting, managing, storing, transmitting, and destroying data are in place to protect the integrity of the data and safeguard the privacy of drivers.

(c) The agency shall not disclose, distribute, make available, sell, access, or otherwise provide for another purpose, personal information or data collected through the RUC program to any private entity or individual unless authorized by a court order, as part of a civil case, by a subpoena issued on behalf of a defendant in a criminal case, by a search warrant, or in aggregate form with all personal information removed for the purposes of academic research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 835, Sec. 2.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3093.)
-------------------------------------------

3092.

(a) The Transportation Agency shall prepare and submit a report of its findings based on the results of the pilot program to the RUC Technical Advisory Committee, the California Transportation Commission, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by no later than June 30, 2018. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a discussion of all of the following issues:

(1) Cost.

(2) Privacy, including recommendations regarding public and private access, including law enforcement, to data collected and stored for purposes of the RUC to ensure individual privacy rights are protected pursuant to Section 1 of Article
 I of the California Constitution.

(3) Jurisdictional issues.

(4) Feasibility.

(5) Complexity.

(6) Acceptance.

(7) Use of revenues.

(8) Security and compliance, including a discussion of processes and security measures necessary to minimize fraud and tax evasion rates.

(9) Data collection technology, including a discussion of the advantages and disadvantages of various types of data collection equipment and the privacy implications and considerations of the equipment.

(10) Potential for additional
 driver services.

(11) Implementation issues.

(b) The California Transportation Commission shall include its recommendations regarding the pilot program in its annual report to the Legislature as specified in Sections 14535 and 14536 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 835, Sec. 2.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3093.)
-------------------------------------------

3092.5.

(a) Commencing on or after January 1, 2023, the Transportation Agency, in consultation with the California Transportation Commission, shall implement a pilot program to identify and evaluate issues related to the collection of revenue for a road charge program.

(b) The Road Usage Charge Technical Advisory Committee shall, by no later than July 1, 2023, make recommendations to the Transportation Agency on the design of the pilot program to test revenue collection, including the group of vehicles to participate in the pilot.

(1) In deciding which group of vehicles to recommend for the pilot, the committee shall consider input from industry experts and relevant stakeholders.

(2) If a vehicle group other than state-owned vehicles is selected, participation in the pilot shall be voluntary.

(3) The committee may make recommendations on the criteria to be used to evaluate the pilot program.

(c) The Transportation Agency shall consult with appropriate state agencies, which may include, but are not limited to, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, and the Controller to design a process for collecting road charge revenue from vehicles. The road charge may be collected by the Transportation Agency or by any entities or persons designated by the agency.

(d) Participants in the pilot program shall be charged a mileage-based fee as specified in
 subdivision (e), and receive a credit or a refund for the estimated state fuel taxes and electric vehicle fees paid to operate a vehicle during the pilot. The credit or refund for electric vehicle fees described in Section 9250.6, which are paid annually, shall be prorated.

(e) For purposes of calculating the mileage-based fee, participating vehicles shall be equally subdivided and randomly assigned to one of two study groups. One group will be subject to a fee per mile traveled, determined by the committee no later than July 1, 2023, that will be the same for all vehicles in that group. The other group will be subject to an individually calculated fee per mile traveled, that is equal to the state per-gallon fuel tax divided by the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s estimated fuel economy rating for that vehicle based on the manufacturer, model, and year of the vehicle.

(f) The pilot program shall not affect funding levels for each program or purpose supported by state fuel tax and electric vehicle fee revenues.

(g) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) and subdivision (c) of Section 3091 shall apply to the pilot program.

(h) The Transportation Agency, in consultation with the California Transportation Commission and the committee, shall, by no later than July 1, 2024, prepare and submit an interim report on the status of the pilot program, and by no later than December 31, 2026, the Transportation Agency, in consultation with the California Transportation Commission and the committee, shall prepare and submit a final report of its findings based on the results of the pilot program, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The final report shall include, but not be limited to, a discussion of costs and
 implementation issues, and an evaluation and comparison of the two fee-calculation methodologies described in subdivision (e), including the effectiveness of those methodologies in ensuring sustainable funding for transportation and their alignment with the state’s climate, air quality, zero-emissions vehicle, and equity goals. The reports required by this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 308, Sec. 2.   (SB 339)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 3093.)
-------------------------------------------

3093.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 308, Sec. 3.   (SB 339)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Chapter 7, commencing with Section 3090.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. REGISTRATION OF VEHICLES AND CERTIFICATES OF TITLE [4000. - 9808.]



CHAPTER 1. Original and Renewal of Registration; Issuance of Certificates of Title [4000. - 5506.]



  ARTICLE 1. Vehicles Subject to Registration [4000. - 4023.]

4000.

(a) (1) A person shall not drive, move, or leave standing upon a highway, or in an offstreet public parking facility, any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, pole or pipe dolly, or logging dolly, unless it is registered and the appropriate fees have been paid under this code or registered under the permanent trailer identification program, except that an off-highway motor vehicle which displays an identification plate or device issued by the department pursuant to Section 38010 may be driven, moved, or left standing in an offstreet public parking facility without being registered or paying registration fees.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “offstreet public
 parking facility” means either of the following:

(A) Any publicly owned parking facility.

(B) Any privately owned parking facility for which no fee for the privilege to park is charged and which is held open for the common public use of retail customers.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to any motor vehicle stored in a privately owned offstreet parking facility by, or with the express permission of, the owner of the privately owned offstreet parking facility.

(4) (A) (i) A violation of this subdivision shall not be the sole basis for any enforcement action before the second month after the month of expiration of the vehicle’s registration.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), if a vehicle is stopped for any other violation of this code, enforcement action for a violation of this subdivision may be taken before the second month following the month of expiration.

(B) This paragraph shall be operative from July 1, 2024, to January 1, 2030, inclusive.

(b) A person shall not drive, move, or leave standing upon a highway any motor vehicle, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 39010) of Part 1 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, that has been registered in violation of Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do
 not apply to off-highway motor vehicles operated pursuant to Sections 38025 and 38026.5.

(d) This section does not apply, following payment of fees due for registration, during the time that registration and transfer is being withheld by the department pending the investigation of any use tax due under the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(e) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a vehicle that is towed by a tow truck on the order of a sheriff, marshal, or other official acting pursuant to a court order or on the order of a peace officer acting pursuant to this code.

(f) Subdivision (a) applies to a vehicle that is towed from a highway or offstreet parking facility under the direction of a highway service organization when that
 organization is providing emergency roadside assistance to that vehicle. However, the operator of a tow truck providing that assistance to that vehicle is not responsible for the violation of subdivision (a) with respect to that vehicle. The owner of an unregistered vehicle that is disabled and located on private property, shall obtain a permit from the department pursuant to Section 4003 prior to having the vehicle towed on the highway.

(g) (1) Pursuant to Section 4022 and to subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (o) of Section 22651, a vehicle obtained by a licensed repossessor as a release of collateral is exempt from registration pursuant to this section for purposes of the repossessor removing the vehicle to their storage facility or the facility of the legal owner. A law enforcement agency, impounding authority, tow yard, storage facility, or any other person in possession of the collateral shall release the vehicle without requiring current registration and pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14602.6.

(2) The legal owner of collateral shall, by operation of law and without requiring further action, indemnify and hold harmless a law enforcement agency, city, county, city and county, the state, a tow yard, storage facility, or an impounding yard from a claim arising out of the release of the collateral to
 a licensee, and from any damage to the collateral after its release, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs associated with defending a claim, if the collateral was released in compliance with this subdivision.

(h) For purposes of this section, possession of a California driver’s license by the registered owner of a vehicle shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that the owner is a resident of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   (AB 256)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of this section, or subdivision (b) of Section 43654 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall require upon initial registration, and upon transfer of ownership and registration, of any motor vehicle subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, a valid certificate of compliance or a certificate of noncompliance, as appropriate, issued in accordance with Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) With respect to new motor vehicles certified pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 43100) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall accept a statement
 completed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 24007 in lieu of the certificate of compliance.

(c) For purposes of determining the validity of a certificate of compliance or noncompliance submitted in compliance with the requirements of this section, the definitions of new and used motor vehicle contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 39010) of Part 1 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code shall control.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a transfer of ownership and registration under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The initial application for transfer is submitted within the 90-day validity period of a smog certificate as specified in Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The transferor is the parent, grandparent,
 sibling, child, grandchild, or spouse of the transferee.

(3) A motor vehicle registered to a sole proprietorship is transferred to the proprietor as owner.

(4) The transfer is between companies the principal business of which is leasing motor vehicles, if there is no change in the lessee or operator of the motor vehicle or between the lessor and the person who has been, for at least one year, the lessee’s operator of the motor vehicle.

(5) The transfer is between the lessor and lessee of the motor vehicle, if there is no change in the lessee or operator of the motor vehicle.

(6) The motor vehicle was manufactured prior to the 1976 model-year.

(7) Except for diesel-powered vehicles, the
 transfer is for a motor vehicle that is four or less model-years old. The department shall impose a fee of eight dollars ($8) on the transferee of a motor vehicle that is four or less model-years old. Revenues generated from the imposition of that fee shall be deposited into the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund.

(e) The State Air Resources Board, under Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, may exempt designated classifications of motor vehicles from subdivision (a) as it deems necessary, and shall notify the department of that action.

(f) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a motor vehicle when an additional individual is added as a registered owner of the motor vehicle.

(g) For purposes of subdivision (a), any collector motor vehicle, as defined in Section 259, is
 exempt from those portions of the test required by subdivision (f) of Section 44012 of the Health and Safety Code, if the collector motor vehicle meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Submission of proof that the motor vehicle is insured as a collector motor vehicle, as shall be required by regulation of the bureau.

(2) The motor vehicle is at least 35 model-years old.

(3) The motor vehicle complies with the exhaust emissions standards for that motor vehicle’s class and model year as prescribed by the department, and the motor vehicle passes a functional inspection of the fuel cap and a visual inspection for liquid fuel leaks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 200, Sec. 7.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.15.

(a) Effective January 1, 2020, the department shall confirm, prior to the initial registration or the transfer of ownership and registration of a diesel-fueled vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds, that the vehicle is compliant with, or exempt from, applicable air pollution control technology requirements pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 39000) of the Health and Safety Code and regulations of the State Air Resources Board adopted pursuant to that division.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for diesel-fueled vehicles subject to Section 43018 of the Health and Safety Code, as applied to the reduction of emissions of diesel particulate matter, oxides of
 nitrogen, and other criteria pollutants from in-use diesel-fueled vehicles, and Section 2025 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations as it read January 1, 2017, or as subsequently amended:

(1) The department shall refuse registration, or renewal or transfer of registration, for a diesel-fueled vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 14,001 pounds to 26,000 pounds for the following vehicle model years:

(A) Effective January 1, 2020, vehicle model years 2004 and older.

(B) Effective January 1, 2021, vehicle model years 2007 and older.

(C) Effective January 1, 2023, vehicle model years 2010 and older.

(2) The department shall
 refuse registration, or renewal or transfer of registration, for a diesel-fueled vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 26,000 pounds for the following vehicle model years:

(A) Effective January 1, 2020, vehicle model years 2000 and older.

(B) Effective January 1, 2021, vehicle model years 2005 and older.

(C) Effective January 1, 2022, vehicle model years 2007 and older.

(D) Effective January 1, 2023, vehicle model years 2010 and older.

(c) (1) As determined by the State Air Resources Board, notwithstanding effective dates and vehicle model years identified in subdivision (b), the
 department may allow registration, or renewal or transfer of registration, for a diesel-fueled vehicle that has been reported to the State Air Resources Board, and is using an approved exemption, or is compliant with applicable air pollution control technology requirements pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 39000) of the Health and Safety Code and regulations of the State Air Resources Board adopted pursuant to that division, including vehicles equipped with the required model year emissions equivalent engine or otherwise using an approved compliance option.

(2) The State Air Resources Board shall notify the department of the vehicles allowed to be registered pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 45.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.17.

(a) For purposes of this section, “heavy-duty vehicle” means a nongasoline heavy-duty onroad motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 14,000 pounds, as defined by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 44152 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) No later than one year after the effective date of a regulation implementing the Heavy-Duty Vehicle Inspection and Maintenance Program (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 44150) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code), the department shall confirm prior to the initial registration, the transfer of ownership, or the renewal of registration that a heavy-duty vehicle is
 compliant with, or exempt from, the Heavy-Duty Vehicle Inspection and Maintenance Program.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to a transfer of ownership and registration under any of the following circumstances:

(1) A motor vehicle registered to a sole proprietorship is transferred to the proprietor as owner.

(2) The transfer is between companies the principal business of which is leasing motor vehicles, if there is no change in the lessee or operator of the motor vehicle or between the lessor and the person who has been, for at least one year, the lessee’s operator of the motor vehicle.

(3) The transfer is between the lessor and lessee of the motor vehicle, if
 there is no change in the lessee or operator of the motor vehicle.

(4) An additional individual is added as a registered owner of the motor vehicle.

(d) The State Air Resources Board shall notify the department of the motor vehicles allowed to be registered pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 298, Sec. 3.   (SB 210)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 43654 of the Health and Safety Code, and, commencing on April 1, 2005, except for model-years exempted from biennial inspection pursuant to Section 44011 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall require upon registration of a motor vehicle subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, previously registered outside this state, a valid certificate of compliance or a certificate of noncompliance, as appropriate, issued in accordance with Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For the purposes of determining the validity of a certificate of compliance or noncompliance submitted in compliance with the requirements of this section, the definitions of new and used motor vehicle contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 39010) of Part 1 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code shall control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 704, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative April 1, 2005, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 704.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 44011 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall require biennially, upon renewal of registration of any motor vehicle subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, a valid certificate of compliance issued in accordance with Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code. The department, in consultation with the Department of Consumer Affairs, shall develop a schedule under which vehicles shall be required biennially to obtain certificates of compliance.

(b) The Department of Consumer Affairs shall provide the department with information on vehicle classes that are subject to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program.

(c) The department shall include any information pamphlet provided by the Department of Consumer Affairs with notification of the inspection requirement and with its renewal notices. The information pamphlet in the renewal notice shall also notify the owner of the motor vehicle of the right to have the vehicle pretested pursuant to Section 44011.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 938, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.37.

(a) Upon application for renewal of registration of a motor vehicle, the department shall require that the applicant submit either a form approved by the department, but issued by the insurer, as specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), or any of the items specified in paragraph (4), as evidence that the applicant is in compliance with the financial responsibility laws of this state.

(1) For vehicles covered by private passenger automobile liability policies and having coverage as described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 660 of the Insurance Code, or policies and coverages for private passenger automobile policies as described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of that section and issued by an automobile assigned risk plan, the form shall include all of the following:

(A) The primary name of the insured covered by the policy or the vehicle owner, or both.

(B) The year, make, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle.

(C) The name, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) number, and the address of the insurance company or surety company providing a policy or bond for the vehicle.

(D) The policy or bond number, and the effective date and expiration date of that policy or bond.

(E) A statement from the insurance company or surety company that the policy or bond meets the requirements of Section 16056 or 16500.5. For the purposes of this section, policies described in Section 11629.71 of the Insurance Code are deemed to meet the requirements of Section 16056.

(2) For vehicles covered by commercial or fleet policies, and not private passenger automobile liability policies, as described in paragraph (1), the form shall include all of the following:

(A) The name and address of the vehicle owner or fleet operator.

(B) The name, the NAIC number, and the address of the insurance company or surety company providing a policy or bond for the vehicle.

(C) The policy or bond number, and the effective date and expiration date of the policy or bond.

(D) A statement from the insurance company or surety company that the policy or bond meets the requirements of Section 16056 or 16500.5 and is a commercial or fleet policy. For vehicles registered pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 5301) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4, one form may be submitted per fleet as specified by the department.

(3) (A) The director may authorize an insurer to issue a form that does not conform to paragraph (1) or (2) if the director does all of the following:

(i) Determines that the entity issuing the alternate form is or will begin reporting the insurance information required under paragraph (1) or (2) to the department through electronic transmission.

(ii) Determines that use of the alternate form furthers the interests of the state by enhancing the enforcement of the state’s financial responsibility laws.

(iii) Approves the contents of the alternate form as providing an adequate means for persons to prove compliance with the financial responsibility laws.

(B) The director may authorize the use of the alternate form in lieu of the forms otherwise required under paragraph (1) or (2) for a period of four years or less and may renew that authority for additional periods of four years or less.

(4) In lieu of evidence of insurance as described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), one of the following documents as evidence of coverage under an alternative form of financial responsibility may be provided by the applicant:

(A) An evidence form, as specified by the department, that indicates either a certificate of self-insurance or an assignment of deposit letter has been issued by the department pursuant to Sections 16053 or 16054.2.

(B) An insurance covering note or binder pursuant to Section 382 or 382.5 of the Insurance Code.

(C) An evidence form that indicates coverage is provided by a charitable risk pool operating under Section 5005.1 of the Corporations Code, if the registered owner of the vehicle is a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of the United States Internal Revenue Code. The evidence form shall include:

(i) The name and address of the vehicle owner or fleet operator.

(ii) The name and address of the charitable risk pool providing the policy for the vehicle.

(iii) The policy number, and the effective date and expiration date of the policy.

(iv) A statement from the charitable risk pool that the policy meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 16054.2.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A vehicle for which a certification has been filed pursuant to Section 4604, until the vehicle is registered for operation upon the highway.

(2) A vehicle that is owned or leased by, or under the direction of, the United States or any public entity that is included in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(3) A vehicle registration renewal application where there is a change of registered owner.

(4) A vehicle for which evidence of liability insurance information has been electronically filed with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 435, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.38.

(a) The department shall suspend, cancel, or revoke the registration of a vehicle when it determines that any of the following circumstances has occurred:

(1) The registration was obtained by providing false evidence of financial responsibility to the department.

(2) Upon notification by an insurance company that the required coverage has been canceled and a sufficient period of time has elapsed since the cancellation notification, as determined by the department, for replacement coverage to be processed and received by the department.

(3) Evidence of financial responsibility has not been
 submitted to the department within 30 days of the issuance of a registration certificate for the original registration or transfer of registration of a vehicle.

(b) (1) Prior to suspending, canceling, or revoking the registration of a vehicle, the department shall notify the vehicle owner of its intent to suspend, cancel, or revoke the registration, and shall provide the vehicle owner a reasonable time, not less than 45 days in cases under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), to provide evidence of financial responsibility or to establish that the vehicle is not being operated.

(2) For the low-cost automobile insurance program established under Section 11629.7 of the Insurance Code, the department shall provide residents with information on the notification document, in plain, boldface type not less than 12 point in size, and in both English and Spanish, stating
 the following:

“California Low-Cost Auto Insurance: A
 program offering affordable automobile insurance is available. Visit (insert Internet Web site address provided by the Department of Insurance) or call toll free (insert toll-free telephone number for the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan or its successor as provided by the Department of Insurance). Qualified applicants must be 19 years of age or older, have a driver’s license for the past three years, and meet income eligibility requirements (insert income example provided by Department of Insurance).”

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, before a registration is reinstated after suspension, cancellation, or revocation, there shall be paid to the department, in addition to any other fees required by this code, a fee sufficient to pay the cost of the reissuance as determined by the department.

(2) Commencing on January 1, 2011, the reissuance fee imposed by paragraph (1) shall not apply to a member of the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces who was on active duty, serving outside of this state in a military conflict during a time of war, as defined in Section 18 of the Military and Veterans Code, at the time of the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of his or her vehicle registration. The person shall submit a copy of his or her official military orders upon requesting the registration reinstatement.
